Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-12] Revenue bonds; investment of
proceeds, and redemption. Subject to any agreement with the holders of its
revenue bonds, the corporation may:

(1) Invest its moneys not required for immediate use,
including proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds, in any investment in
accordance with procedures prescribed in a trust indenture; and

(2) Purchase its revenue bonds out of any fund or
money of the corporation available therefor, and hold, cancel, or resell the
revenue bonds. [L 1994, c 264, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next